District of Columbia statutes.
21-313

Powers of custodian.

(a)

A custodian, acting in a custodial capacity, has all the rights, powers, and authority over custodial property that unmarried adult owners have over their own property, but a custodian may exercise those rights, powers, and authority in that capacity only.

(b)

This section does not relieve a custodian from liability for breach of section 21-312.

History

Mar. 12, 1986, D.C. Law 6-87, § 2(a), 33 DCR 278

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 21-313.

Editor's Notes

Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 13 of the Uniform Transfers to Minors Act.